Maine, session 132, LD1245.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §3207 is enacted to read:
§3207. Working Waterfront Information and Technical Assistance Fund
The Working Waterfront Information and Technical Assistance Fund, referred to in
this section as "the fund," is established. Balances in the fund may not lapse and must be
carried forward and used for the purposes of this section. The fund is administered by the
office, and the office may accept and deposit in the fund money from private and public
sources. In carrying out the purposes of the fund, the office shall work with the Department
of Economic and Community Development, Office of Tourism; the Department of Marine
Resources; coastal municipal and regional governments; and organizations and coalitions
that have experience advocating for developing and protecting working waterfronts in the
State and experience working with persons who use working waterfronts in the State. In
collaboration with the entities listed in this section, the office shall use the fund in the
production of working waterfront information campaigns and the provision of technical
assistance to encourage protection and development of working waterfronts. As used in
this section, "working waterfront" means a parcel of land abutting water subject to tidal
influence or land located in the intertidal zone that is used primarily or predominantly to
provide access to or support the conduct of commercial fishing and marine activities.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §3208 is enacted to read:
§3208. Working Waterfront Advisory Council
The Working Waterfront Advisory Council, established by section 12004-I, subsection
57-I and referred to in this section as "the council," is established to address issues facing
the State's working waterfronts.
1. Membership. The director shall appoint up to 15 members to the council who, to
the greatest extent possible, must represent federally recognized Indian nations, tribes or
bands in the State, municipalities, nonprofit organizations, trade organizations, educational
institutions, individuals and industries that represent or use working waterfronts in the
Page 1 - 132LR0869(03)

State. To the greatest extent possible, the membership of the council must reflect a
geographic distribution along the coast.
In making appointments, the director shall consider and appoint residents of the State who
have knowledge of problems facing working waterfronts in the State, have experience in
advocacy relating to working waterfront issues or provide leadership in programs or
activities that create and improve opportunities or spread awareness related to working
waterfronts and persons that use them.
2. Term. A member's term is for 3 years. If a member is unable to complete the term,
the director shall appoint a member pursuant to subsection 1 to serve out the unexpired
portion of the term.
3. Officers; staff. The officers of the council are the chair and the vice-chair. The
term of the officers is one year. The council shall elect a member of the council for each
officer position at the first regular meeting of each year. The council is staffed by the
office.
4. Meetings. The council shall meet at least 4 times per year. It may meet at other
times at the call of the chair or the director.
5. Council report. By February 1, 2026 and annually thereafter, the council shall
submit a report to the joint standing committees of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
economic and community development matters and marine resources matters on the status
of the condition of, the current and future challenges concerning and recommendations
related to working waterfronts in the State, including, but not limited to:
A. How to best use state agencies, municipal governments, working waterfront
industries and citizen groups to protect and improve access to working waterfronts in
the State;
B. Matters of interest to working waterfront industries and communities in the State,
including, but not limited to, geographic information systems mapping and inventory,
climate and resilience, preservation and access, affordable workforce housing, climate-
driven relocation, water quality and ecosystems, workforce development, health care
access, the marine resources economy and economic development, including public-
private partnerships, decarbonization and electrification and developing new working
waterfronts; and
C. Information on relevant existing federal, state, municipal, educational organization
and nonprofit organization data, plans, recommendations and studies that relate to
working waterfronts in the State and updates on progress made in state plans that
include references to working waterfronts.
After reviewing the report, either joint standing committee may report out legislation to
implement any recommendations contained in the report.
6. Director report. By February 1, 2026 and annually thereafter, the director shall
submit a report to the joint standing committees of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
matters related to the office on the status of initiatives regarding working waterfronts,
including information from coalitions, task forces and engagements with municipal and
tribal governments. After reviewing the report, either joint standing committee may report
out legislation to implement any recommendations contained in the report.
Page 2 - 132LR0869(03)

Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §12004-I, sub-§57-I is enacted to read:
57-I.
Marine Working Waterfront Not Authorized 5 MRSA §3208
Resources Advisory Council
Sec. 4. Working Waterfront Advisory Council initial membership
appointments. Notwithstanding the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 3208,
subsection 2, in making the initial membership appointments to the Working Waterfront
Advisory Council established pursuant to Title 5, section 12004-I, subsection 57-I, the
Director of the Maine Office of Community Affairs shall make the initial membership
appointment terms staggered so that approximately 1/3 of the members are appointed for a
term of 3 years, approximately 1/3 of the members are appointed for a term of 2 years and
approximately 1/3 of the members are appointed for a term of one year.
Sec. 5. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
MAINE OFFICE OF COMMUNITY AFFAIRS
Working Waterfront Information and Technical Assistance Fund N542
Initiative: Provides ongoing allocations to establish the Working Waterfront Information
and Technical Assistance Fund.
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $500
__________ __________
OTHER SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS TOTAL $500 $500
Page 3 - 132LR0869(03)